Hawaii statutes.
§621-10 Reporting daily. Every witness
in a criminal case subpoenaed for the State or for a defendant by order of the
court at the expense of the State shall, unless temporarily excused, report in
person daily to the clerk of the circuit court from the time of the witness'
appearance to the date of the witness' discharge and no per diem shall be
allowed for any pay upon which attendance is not reported. [L 1907, c 53, §4;
RL 1925, §2563; RL 1935, §3819; RL 1945, §9830; am imp L 1945, c 35, §1; RL
1955, §222-10; HRS §621-10; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next